Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 7

Applicability

66-34-701. Prohibited waiver — Applicability of provisions.

As a matter of public policy, except as specifically noted, compliance with §§66-11-104,66-34-205,66-34-304,66-34-602, and66-34-603 may not be waived by contract and these sections are applicable to all private contracts and all construction contracts with this state, any department, board, or agency thereof, including the University of Tennessee, all counties and municipalities and all departments, boards, or agencies thereof, including all school and education boards, and any other subdivision of the state.

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1; 2020, ch. 749, § 32.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added “As a matter of public policy,” inserted “66-11-104,” and substituted “, 66-34-602, and 66-34-603” for “and 66-34-602”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

66-34-702. Construction or home improvement contracts.

This chapter shall not apply to contracts for the construction of, or home improvement to, any land or building, or that portion thereof which is used or designed to be used as a residence or dwelling place for one (1), two (2), three (3) or four (4) single family units.

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1.

66-34-703. Applicability of chapter.

This chapter does not apply to any bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, industrial loan and thrift company, other regulated financial institution, or insurance company.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), if a bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, industrial loan and thrift company, other regulated financial institution, or insurance company acts in the capacity of an original owner in the event of building its own structure or assumes a project due to its debtor's default and proceeds with completion of the project, then the entity is subject to this chapter, except for §§ 66-34-104(c) and (j); however, the retained amount may be deposited in an account within the entity's own institution.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) or any other provision of this chapter to the contrary:

A bank, savings and loan association, industrial loan and thrift company, other regulated financial institution, or insurance company shall pay any sums held in trust pursuant to § 66-34-205 in accordance with an order of any court issued pursuant to § 66-34-602; and

A bank, savings and loan association, industrial loan and thrift company, other regulated financial institution, or insurance company is not liable for damages pursuant to § 66-34-104(c) based on the failure of an owner to place retainage in a separate interest-bearing, escrow account as required by § 66-34-104(a).

Acts 1991, ch. 443, § 1; 2020, ch. 749, § 33.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “, the Prompt Pay Act of 1991, as enacted by Acts 1991, chapter 45,” following “This chapter” in (a); and added (b) and (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

66-34-704. Agreement limiting liability of person furnishing labor, materials, or services.

Without limiting any existing law or regulation, it is not against the public policy or public interest of this state for a provision in any agreement relating to the design, planning, supervision, observation of construction, repair, or construction of an improvement to real property to limit the liability of the person furnishing the labor, materials, or services to a reasonable monetary amount.

Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 34.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which enacted this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.